Maryland, session 2025, HB1167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Land Use
20–509.
(a) Subject to subsections (b), (c), and (d) of this section, by local law, the
legislative body of a municipal corporation or governed special taxing district may impose
an additional or stricter building requirement than is required by a State, regional, or
county unit that exercises zoning or planning authority over the municipal corporation or
governed district if the authority is exercised in addition to the State, regional, or county
zoning or planning authority.
(b) (1) [A] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A building
requirement adopted under this section:
[(1)] (I) shall be imposed for:
[(i)] 1. the protection of the public health, safety, and welfare; or
– 1 –

Ch. 780 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(ii)] 2. the preservation, improvement, or protection of lands,
water, and improvements in the municipal corporation or governed special taxing district;
[and]
[(2)] (II) may regulate only the construction, repair, or remodeling of
[single–family] residential houses, buildings, or other structures on land zoned for
PREDOMINANTLY single–family residential use AS OF JANUARY 1, 2024, BUILDINGS
WITH FOUR OR FEWER DWELLING UNITS, INCLUDING SINGLE–UNIT HOUSES,
DUPLEXES, TRIPLEXES, QUADPLEXES, COTTAGE CLUSTERS, TOWNHOUSES, AND
SIMILAR BUILDINGS, AND THEIR ACCESSORY STRUCTURES, as it relates to:
[(i)] 1. fences, walls, hedges, and similar barriers;
[(ii)] 2. signs;
[(iii)] 3. residential parking;
[(iv)] 4. residential storage;
[(v)] 5. the location of BUILDINGS AND structures, including
setback requirements;
[(vi)] 6. the dimensions of BUILDINGS AND structures, including
height, bulk, massing, and design; and
[(vii)] 7. lot coverage, including impervious surface; AND
(III) SHALL APPLY WITHOUT REGARD TO HOUSING TYPE.
(2) A BUILDING REQUIREMENT ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION FOR
MULTIFAMILY HOUSING RESIDENTIAL BUILDINGS WITH TWO TO FOUR DWELLING
UNITS:
(I) MAY NOT BE MORE RESTRICTIVE THAN A BUILDING
REQUIREMENT ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION FOR SINGLE–FAMILY HOUSING A
SINGLE–UNIT HOUSE; BUT
(II) MAY BE LESS RESTRICTIVE THAN A BUILDING
REQUIREMENT ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION FOR
SINGLE–FAMILY HOUSING A SINGLE–UNIT HOUSE.
(c) Before adopting a local law under this section, a municipal corporation or
governed special taxing district shall:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 780
(1) hold a public hearing; and
(2) at least 30 days before the public hearing, transmit a copy of the
proposed local law to the county council.
(d) A local law that a municipal corporation or governed special taxing district
adopts under this section shall provide a procedure for a waiver from the strict application
of the building requirements.
(e) By local law, a municipal corporation or governed special taxing district may
enact an additional or stricter commercial sign regulation than is imposed by the State, the
Commission, or the county.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 3 –